cs: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Dětské zbraně: Dětské zbraně nablízko a štíty; Špionážní a detektivní sady; Dětské blástry a vystřelovače
hr-HR: Igračke i igre > Igračke > Oružja i naprave za igranje: Oružja i štitovi za blisku borbu za igru uloga; Špijunski uređaji i kompleti za detektiva; Igračke blasteri i projektili
zh-TW: 玩具和遊戲 > 玩具 > 玩具武器: 角色扮演近戰武器與盾牌; 間諜小工具與偵探工具包; 玩具發射器與拋射玩具
ro-RO: Jucării și jocuri > Jucării > Arme și gadgeturi de jucărie: Arme corp la corp și scuturi pentru jocuri de rol; Gadgeturi de spion și kituri de detectiv; Lansatoare de jucărie și jucării cu proiectile
pt-BR: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Armas de brinquedo: Armas de combate corpo a corpo e escudos de faz de conta; Dispositivos de espionagem e kits de detetive; Lançadores e brinquedos de projéteis
sk-SK: Hračky a hry > Hračky > Hračkárske zbrane: Hranie rolí: Zbrane na blízko a štíty; Špionážne pomôcky a detektívne súpravy; Hračkárske blastery a projektily
tr: Oyuncaklar ve Oyunlar > Oyuncaklar > Oyuncak Silahlar ve Aletler: Rol yapma oyunu yakın dövüş silahları ve kalkanları; Casus aletleri ve dedektif kitleri; Oyuncak silahlar ve fırlatmalı oyuncaklar
nl: Speelgoed en spellen > Speelgoed > Speelgoedwapens: Slagwapens en schilden voor rollenspellen; Spionagegadgets en detectivesets; Speelgoedblasters en schietspeelgoed
th: ของเล่นและเกม > ของเล่น > อาวุธของเล่นและอุปกรณ์ต่างๆ: อาวุธประชิดและโล่ของเล่นบทบาทสมมติ; แกดเจ็ตสายลับและชุดเครื่องมือนักสืบ; ปืนของเล่นและของเล่นประเภทยิง
hu: Játékok és játékszerek > Játékok > Játékfegyverek és kütyük: Szerepjátékos közelharci fegyverek és pajzsok; Kémeszközök és nyomozókészletek; Játékkilövők és lövedékes játékok
da: Legetøj og spil > Legetøj > Legetøjsvåben: Nærkampvåben og skjolde til rollespil; Spiongadgets og detektivsæt; Legetøjsblastere og -projektilvåben
ru: Игрушки и игры > Игрушки > Игрушечные оружие и гаджеты: Игрушечное холодное оружие и щиты для ролевых игр; Шпионские гаджеты и наборы детектива; Игрушечные бластеры и оружие со снарядами
sl-SI: Igrače in igre > Igrače > Orožja in naprave za igranje: Orožja in ščiti za igro vlog; Vohunske naprave in detektivski kompleti; Strelske igrače
de: Spielzeuge & Spiele > Spielzeuge > Spielzeugwaffen: Nahkampfwaffen & Schilde für Rollenspiele; Spionage-Gadgets & Detektiv-Sets; Spielzeug-Blaster & Projektil-Spielzeug
fr: Jeux et jouets > Jouets > Armes jouets et gadgets: Armes de mêlée et boucliers de jeu de rôle; Gadgets d’espionnage et kits de détective; Pistolets jouets et lanceurs de projectiles
ja: おもちゃ・ゲーム > おもちゃ > おもちゃの武器・キャラクタートイ: ロールプレイ用近接武器・盾; スパイガジェット・探偵キット; おもちゃのブラスター・発射玩具
pl: Gry i zabawki > Zabawki > Broń zabawkowa: Broń biała i tarcze do odgrywania ról; Gadżety szpiegowskie i zestawy detektywistyczne; Zabawkowe miotacze i zabawki strzelające
en: Toys & Games > Toys > Toy Weapons & Gadgets: Role-Play Melee Weapons & Shields; Spy Gadgets & Detective Kits; Toy Blasters & Projectile Toys
pt-PT: Brinquedos e jogos > Brinquedos > Brinquedos de aparelhos e armas: Armas de combate corpo a corpo e escudos de faz-de-conta; Gadgets de espião e kits de detetive; Lançadores e brinquedos de projéteis
fi: Lelut ja pelit > Lelut > Leluaseet ja -laitteet: Roolipelien lähitaisteluaseet ja kilvet; Vakoojalaitteet ja etsiväpakkaukset; Lelupyssyt ja ammuslelut
ko: 장난감/게임 > 장난감 > 장난감 무기/가젯: 역할놀이용 근접 무기 및 방패; 스파이 도구 및 탐정 키트; 장난감 블래스터 및 발사체 완구
it: Giochi e giocattoli > Giocattoli > Gadget e armi giocattolo: Armi bianche e scudi per giochi di ruolo; Gadget da spia e kit da detective; Blaster giocattolo e armi a proiettili
vi: Đồ chơi & Trò chơi > Đồ chơi > Phụ tùng và vũ khí đồ chơi: Vũ khí cận chiến và khiên nhập vai; Dụng cụ điệp viên và bộ đồ chơi thám tử; Súng đồ chơi và đồ chơi phóng đạn
sv: Leksaker och spel > Leksaker > Leksaksvapen: Närstridsvapen och sköldar för rollspel; Spionprylar och detektivkit; Leksaksblasters och projektilleksaker
nb: Leker og spill > Leker > Lekevåpen og -dingser: Nærkampsvåpen og skjold for rollespill; Spionutstyr og detektivsett; Lekeblastere og prosjektilleker
zh-CN: 玩具/游戏 > 玩具 > 玩具武器/小机件: 角色扮演近战武器和盾牌; 间谍工具和侦探套件; 玩具发射器和抛射玩具
lt-LT: Žaislai ir žaidimai > Žaislai > Žaisliniai ginklai ir prietaisai: Vaidmenų žaidimų artimos kovos ginklai ir skydai; Šnipų įtaisai ir detektyvų rinkiniai; Žaisliniai blasteriai ir šaudantys žaislai
el: Παιχνίδια > Παιχνίδια (Toys) > Παιχνίδια όπλα & Gadgets: Όπλα σώμα με σώμα και ασπίδες για παιχνίδι ρόλων; Εξοπλισμός κατασκόπων και κιτ ντετέκτιβ; Εκτοξευτές και παιχνίδια βολών
es: Juegos y juguetes > Juguetes > Armas y artilugios de juguete: Armas cuerpo a cuerpo y escudos de juego de rol; Gadgets de espía y kits de detective; Lanzadores de juguete y juguetes de proyectiles
bg-BG: Играчки и игри > Играчки > Играчки оръжия и джаджи: Ролеви хладни оръжия и щитове; Шпионски джаджи и детективски комплекти; Играчки оръдия и патрони